Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.073

Rule-making proceedings—Exemptions.

All rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter must be in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW except that rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310, 43.135.055, and the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, when the proposed rule is subject to a referendum.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 15 s 5; 2002 c 313 s 125.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.